Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 89.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8207
Basic level trauma center, defined.

Basic level trauma center means a trauma center which has a trauma-trained physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant available within thirty minutes to provide stabilization and transfer to a higher level trauma center when appropriate, which has basic equipment for resuscitation and stabilization, which maintains appropriate equipment for pediatric trauma patients for resuscitation and stabilization, and which may provide limited surgical intervention based upon the expertise of available onsite staff.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 7;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 86;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 89.